Texas statutes.
HUMAN RESOURCES CODE

TITLE 2. HUMAN SERVICES AND PROTECTIVE SERVICES IN GENERAL

SUBTITLE B. ADMINISTRATIVE PROVISIONS AND GENERAL FUNCTIONS RELATING TO HUMAN SERVICES

CHAPTER 21. ADMINISTRATIVE PROVISIONS RELATING TO AGENCIES ADMINISTERING ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS

Sec. 21.011. ANNUAL REPORT ON DEPARTMENT OF AGING AND DISABILITY SERVICES. On or before December 31 of each year the Department of Aging and Disability Services shall prepare and submit to the commission a full report on the operation and administration of the department under this title together with the department's recommendations for changes. The commission shall submit the report to the governor and the legislature.

Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2339, ch. 842, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1979. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 18, Sec. 1, eff. April 3, 1985; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 1052, Sec. 1.05, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 693, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1169, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1083 (S.B. 1179), Sec. 25(101), eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 4.007, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 21.012. CONFIDENTIALITY OF INFORMATION. (a) The executive commissioner shall establish reasonable rules governing the custody, use, and preservation of the records, papers, files, and communications of the commission and the Department of Aging and Disability Services under this title. The commission and the department shall:

(1) enforce the agency's rules; and

(2) provide safeguards which restrict the use or disclosure of information concerning applicants for or recipients of the commission's and the department's assistance programs to purposes directly connected with the administration of the programs.

(b) If under a provision of law lists of the names and addresses of recipients of the commission's or the department's assistance programs are furnished to or held by a governmental agency other than the commission or the department, that agency or the person with responsibility for adopting rules for that agency shall adopt rules necessary to prevent the publication of the lists or the use of the lists for purposes not directly connected with the administration of the assistance programs.

Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2339, ch. 842, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1979.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 4.007, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 21.013. OATHS AND ACKNOWLEDGMENTS. A local representative of the commission or the Department of Aging and Disability Services who is responsible for investigating and determining the eligibility of an applicant for assistance authorized in this title may administer oaths and take acknowledgments concerning all matters relating to the administration of this title. The representative shall sign the oaths or acknowledgments and indicate the representative's position and title but need not seal the instruments. The representative has the same authority as a notary public coextensive with the limits of the state for the purpose of administering the provisions of this title.

Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2339, ch. 842, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1979.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 4.007, eff. April 2, 2015.